Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.163

Notifications—Appeals.

(1) A school district superintendent, a designee of the superintendent, or a principal of a school who receives information pursuant to RCW 28A.225.330, 9A.44.138, 13.04.155, 13.40.215, or 72.09.730 shall comply with the notification provisions described in this section.

(2) Upon receipt of information described in subsection (1) of this section, a school district superintendent or a designee of the superintendent must provide the received information to the principal of the school where the student is enrolled or will enroll, or if not known, where the student was most recently enrolled.

(3)(a) Upon receipt of information about a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, the principal must comply with the notification requirements in RCW 9A.44.138.

(b) Upon receipt of information about a violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, any crime under chapter 9.41 RCW, unlawful possession or delivery, or both, of a controlled substance in violation of chapter 69.50 RCW, or a school disciplinary action, the principal, subject to requirements of subsection (4) of this section, has discretion to share the information with a school district staff member if, in the principal's judgment, the information is necessary for:

(i) The staff member to supervise the student;

(ii) The staff member to provide or refer the student to therapeutic or behavioral health services; or

(iii) Security purposes.

(4)(a) Upon receipt of information about an adjudication in juvenile court for an unlawful possession of a controlled substance in violation of chapter 69.50 RCW, the principal must notify the student and the parent or legal guardian at least five days before sharing the information with a school district staff member.

(b) If either the student or the student's parent or legal guardian objects to the proposed sharing of the information, the student, the student's parent or legal guardian, or both, may, within five business days of receiving notice from the principal, appeal the decision to share the information with staff to the superintendent of the school district in accordance with procedures adopted by the district.

(c) The superintendent shall have five business days after receiving an appeal under (b) of this subsection to make a written determination on the matter. Determinations by superintendents under this subsection are final and not subject to further appeal.

(d) A principal may not share adjudication information under this subsection with a school district staff member while an appeal is pending.

(5) Any information received by school district staff under this section is exempt from disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW and may not be further disseminated except as provided in RCW 28A.225.330, other statutes or case law, and the family and educational and privacy rights act of 1994 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g et seq.).

[ 2020 c 167 s 1.]